Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RURAL CANCER INSTITUTE PILOT PROGRAM APPROPRIATION MODIFICATION.new text end new text begin (a) The appropriation for the Rural Cancer Institute pilot program in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 6, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (bbb), must prioritize Minnesota clinicians and students. The Rural Cancer Institute may work with clinicians and students from elsewhere in the United States if the clinician or student receives the recommendation of a practicing Minnesota oncologist and all care is provided in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriations in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 for the Rural Cancer Institute pilot program in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 6, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (bbb), are available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end